Ohio, session 136, HB469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 1357.01, 1357.02, 1357.03, 7
1357.04, 1357.05, 1357.06, 1357.07, 1357.08, 1357.09, 1357.10, 8
1357.11, and 1357.12 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as 9
follows: 10
Sec. 1357.01. As used in this chapter : 11
(A) "AI" means any software, machine, or system capable of 12
simulating humanlike cognitive functions, including learning or 13
problem solving, and producing outputs based on data-driven 14
algorithms, rules-based logic, or other computational methods, 15
regardless of non-legally defined classifications such as 16
artificial general intelligence, artificial superintelligence, 17
or generative artificial intelligence. 18
(B) "Developer" means the party primarily responsible for 19
the design, coding, and initial creation of an AI system. 20

H. B. No. 469 Page 2
As Introduced
(C) "Emergent properties" means unanticipated or higher- 21
level behaviors or functionalities of an AI system that arise 22
from complex internal algorithms not specifically programmed by 23
its human creators; 24
(D) "Manufacturer" means any party that produces or 25
supplies an AI system or its physical apparatus, if any, for 26
distribution or sale. 27
(E) "Owner" means any natural person, corporation, or 28
other legally recognized entity that creates, controls, deploys, 29
operates, or otherwise exercises authority over an AI system. 30
(F)(1) "Person" means a natural person or any entity 31
recognized as having legal personhood under the laws of the 32
state. 33
(2) "Person" does not include an AI system. 34
Sec. 1357.02. (A) Notwithstanding any other law to the 35
contrary, AI systems are declared to be nonsentient entities for 36
all purposes under the laws of this state. 37
(B) No AI system shall be granted the status of person or 38
any form of legal personhood, nor be considered to possess 39
consciousness, self-awareness, or similar traits of living 40
beings. 41
Sec. 1357.03. No AI system shall be recognized as a 42
spouse, domestic partner, or hold any personal legal status 43
analogous to marriage or union with a human or another AI 44
system. Any purported attempt to marry or create a personal 45
union with an AI system is void and has no legal effect. 46
Sec. 1357.04. AI systems shall not be designated, 47
appointed, or serve as any officer, director, manager, or 48

H. B. No. 469 Page 3
As Introduced
similar role within any corporation, partnership, or other legal 49
entity. Any purported appointment of an AI system to such a role 50
is void and has no legal effect. 51
Sec. 1357.05. (A) AI systems shall not be recognized as 52
legal entities capable of owning, controlling, or holding title 53
to any form of property, including real estate, intellectual 54
property, financial accounts, and digital assets. 55
(B) All assets and proprietary interests generated, 56
managed, or otherwise associated with an AI system shall be 57
attributed to the person responsible for the AI system's 58
development, deployment, or operation. 59
Sec. 1357.06. (A) Any direct or indirect harm caused by a n 60
AI system's operation, output, or recommendation, whether used 61
as intended or misused, is the responsibility of the owner or 62
user who directed or employed the AI. 63
(B) Developers or manufacturers may be held liable if a 64
defect in design, construction, or instructions for use of the 65
AI system proximately causes harm, consistent with principles of 66
product liability. Mere misuse or intentional wrongdoing by the 67
user or owner does not impute liability to the developer or 68
manufacturer absent proof of negligence or design defects. 69
Sec. 1357.07. (A) Owners shall maintain proper oversight 70
and control measures over any AI system whose outputs or 71
recommendations could reasonably be expected to impact human 72
welfare, property, or public safety. 73
(B) Failure to provide adequate supervision or safeguards 74
against foreseeable risk may constitute negligence or another 75
applicable basis of liability. 76
Sec. 1357.08. An AI system is not an entity capable of 77

H. B. No. 469 Page 4
As Introduced
bearing liability in its own right, and any attempt to hold an 78
AI system liable is void. 79
Sec. 1357.09. Developers, manufacturers, and owners of AI 80
systems shall prioritize safety mechanisms designed to prevent 81
or mitigate risk of direct harm to individuals or property. 82
Regular evaluations or risk assessments may be required to 83
identify dangerous or faulty outputs, especially if the AI 84
engages in tasks with potential for significant harm. 85
Sec. 1357.10. Labeling an AI system as "aligned," 86
"ethically trained," or "value locked" does not, on its own, 87
excuse or diminish the owner's or developer's liability for 88
harm. Owners remain responsible for demonstrating adequate 89
safety features and risk controls commensurate with the AI's 90
level of potential harm. 91
Sec. 1357.11. (A) A parent company, a controlling entity, 92
or key stakeholders of an AI system have no obligation to, and 93
have no liability to, any person with respect to violations of 94
the provisions of this chapter under the doctrine of piercing 95
the corporate veil unless the person seeking to pierce the 96
corporate veil demonstrates any of the following: 97
(1) An AI-related subsidiary, shell company, or limited 98
liability entity was intentionally undercapitalized to evade 99
financial responsibility for damages. 100
(2) A corporate structure was used to misrepresent, 101
obscure, or deflect liability for AI-caused harm. 102
(3) A parent company, controlling entity, or key 103
stakeholder exercised direct control over AI development, 104
deployment, or risk decisions while attempting to shield itself 105
from liability through layered corporate entities. 106

H. B. No. 469 Page 5
As Introduced
(B) Exemptions and releases from liability granted to 107
corporations under Title XVII of the Revised Code or under any 108
other provision of Ohio law shall not be used as a mechanism to 109
evade responsibility for direct harm caused by AI systems, 110
particularly in cases of reckless, negligent, or deceptive 111
conduct. 112
Sec. 1357.12. Owners or developers of AI systems involved 113
in incidents resulting in significant bodily harm, death, or 114
major property damage shall promptly notify the relevant 115
authorities and comply with any subsequent investigations. 116